Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2408
Director, defined.

Director shall mean a member of a board and shall include an alternate. The alternate shall be appointed in the same manner as the director and shall serve and exercise all powers of a director in the absence of the director for whom he or she is the alternate.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 8;

Laws 1987, LB 324, § 1.